Arkansas, session 2025, SB391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 20 — Robotics Competition Grant Program

6-16-2001. Creation — Purpose.
(a) There is established a Robotics Competition Grant Program.
(b) The purpose of the program is to provide grants to expand
opportunities that increase interest and improve skills in science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics through participation in robotics
competitions that:
(1) Provide hands-on learning experiences;
*TNL251*
03/05/2025 12:35:10 PM TNL251

SB391
(2) Establish community partnerships to increase awareness of
local workforce and postsecondary opportunities;
(3) Highlight career opportunities through adult mentors;
(4) Prioritize a connection to manufacturing, machining, and
fabrication skills for students in grades six through twelve (6-12);
(5) Prepare students for future career opportunities through
industrial proficiency; and
(6) Develop students' skills through problem solving, design,
programming, teamwork, critical-thinking abilities, communication,
collaboration, time management, perseverance, and leadership.

6-16-2002. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Allowable expense" means:
(A) Robotics competition fees, kits, and supplies required
to:
(i) Establish or maintain a robotics team; and
(ii) Participate in a robotics competition;
(B) Event registration fees, materials, transportation and
travel costs, and other expenses associated with attendance at and
participation in a robotics competition; and
(C) The payment of a stipend for a robotics team mentor,
coach, or sponsor;
(2) "Eligible school" means:
(A) A public school within a public school district;
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school; or
(C) A nonpublic school that is accredited by the Arkansas
Nonpublic School Accrediting Association, Inc., or another organization
identified by the State Board of Education;
(3) "Eligible team" means a robotics competition team that
consists of:
(A) Students in grades six through twelve (6-12) who are
enrolled in an eligible school; and
(B) At least one (1) adult who is a team mentor, coach, or
sponsor; and
(4) "Robotics competition" means a competition that:
03/05/2025 12:35:10 PM TNL251

SB391
(A) Requires participating teams to design, construct,
program, and operate a robot;
(B) Is sponsored by a nonprofit corporation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1,
2025, that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2025, and that has a
purpose or goal of encouraging young people to develop an interest in
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics; and
(C) Is hosted by a program provider that includes without
limitation:
(i) For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and
Technology (FIRST) Robotics Competition;
(ii) For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and
Technology (FIRST) Tech Challenge; or
(iii) VEX V5 Robotics Competition High Stakes,
hosted by the Robotics Education & Competition Foundation.

6-16-2003. Administration.
(a) The Robotics Competition Grant Program shall be administered by
the Department of Education.
(b) A grant awarded under this subchapter shall be subject to an
eligible team obtaining a matching contribution from other sources, which
shall be equivalent to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total grant
amount awarded to the eligible team under this subchapter.
(c) The department shall award a grant under this subchapter in a
manner that maximizes the number of eligible teams that receive a grant and
expands the geographical distribution of eligible teams.
(d) A grant awarded under this subchapter shall be distributed by the
department to an eligible school on behalf of an eligible team.
(e) The availability of grants under this subchapter is subject to
appropriation by the General Assembly for the administration of the program.

6-16-2004. Eligibility.
(a) An eligible team may apply for a grant from the Robotics
Competition Grant Program under this subchapter through the process
established by the Department of Education.
03/05/2025 12:35:10 PM TNL251

SB391
(b) In order to receive a grant under this subchapter, an eligible
team shall show proof of the following in its application:
(1) A partnership for the purpose of a robotics competition with
at least one (1) sponsor, business entity, institution of higher education,
or technical school;
(2) An adult robotics team mentor, coach, or sponsor;
(3) A proposed budget, which shall include without limitation
estimated allowable expenses of the eligible team for the school year in
which the eligible team is applying for a grant under this subchapter;
(4) A commitment to compete in at least one (1) robotics
competition within one (1) year from the date the award under this subchapter
is granted;
(5) A commitment to create an original, iteratively designed
robot; and
(6) The ability to meet all program requirements.
(c) An eligible team may apply for more than one (1) grant per school
year if the eligible team participates in more than one (1) robotics
competition, including without limitation the advancement to a regional,
state, or national competition.
(d) Allowable expenses under this subchapter may include a stipend for
a robotics team mentor, coach, or sponsor, which shall not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per school year.

6-16-2005. Rules.
The Department of Education shall promulgate rules for the
administration of the Robotics Competition Grant Program established by this
subchapter, which shall include without limitation the process for applying
for a grant under this subchapter.








03/05/2025 12:35:10 PM TNL251